Florida, session 2026, HB4039.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Monarch Hill Landfill; Expansion Requirements
in Broward County.
(1) Definition.—As used in this section, the term "Monarch
Hill Landfill" refers to the solid waste disposal facility
located in Broward County, currently operated under permits
issued by the Department of Environmental Protection.
(2) Feasibility Study Requirement.—Before issuing or
approving any application, zoning change, permit, or development
order that would allow for the physical expansion of the Monarch
Hill Landfill, Broward County must commission a feasibility
study, to be conducted by an independent third-party entity with
expertise in environmental engineering, solid waste management,
and public health impacts. The feasibility study must include,
but need not be limited to:
(a) Assessment of the environmental and public health
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4039 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4039 2026 Legislature
impacts of the proposed expansion.
(b) Analysis of alternative waste management solutions,
including waste-to-energy technologies.
(c) Evaluation of potential impacts to surrounding
communities, including odor, traffic, noise, and groundwater
contamination.
(d) Consideration of the cumulative impact of existing
operations and the proposed expansion.
(3) Public Hearing Requirement.—At least one public
hearing must be held in Broward County, within a 5-mile radius
of the Monarch Hill Landfill, before the final approval of any
proposed expansion. The hearing must meet all of the following
requirements:
(a) Be publicly noticed at least 30 days in advance
through local media, the county's website, and direct notice to
property owners within a 2-mile radius of the Monarch Hill
Landfill.
(b) Allow for meaningful public input, including written
and oral testimony.
(c) Include a presentation of the findings of the
feasibility study.
(4) Conditions on Expansion Approval and Permitting.—
Approval of an application, zoning change, permit, or
development order that would allow for the physical expansion of
the Monarch Hill Landfill may not proceed until the feasibility
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4039 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4039 2026 Legislature
study and public hearing required in this section have been
completed and publicly disclosed.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4039 -00-er